Utah statutes.
53B-6-101.   Additional responsibilities of the board -- Studies and
evaluations -- Master plan for higher education -- Productivity --
Institutional student assessment -- Biennial accountability report to the
Legislature.
(1)  The board shall conduct continuing studies and evaluations of the
facilities, grounds, buildings, and equipment at the higher education
institutions under its jurisdiction and use space utilization and other
studies conducted by the State Building Board.
(2)  The board shall establish and maintain an up-to-date master plan which
shall include:
(a)  providing for statewide planning of public higher education in terms of
aims, purposes, and objectives of the system as a whole;
(b)  establishing and defining the role and programs of each institution
within the system;
(c)  establishing criteria for and determination of the future needs and
requirements for new programs and new institutions and the elimination,
curtailment, or consolidation of existing programs and facilities;
(d)  providing for the initiation and financing of projects as considered
necessary to meet and satisfy the projected patterns of growth and
maintenance;
(e)  establishing criteria for and determination of the operating and capital
budgetary needs of each institution and the system as a whole;
(f)  recommending the methods and sources of future financial support of the
higher education system;
(g)  establishing procedures for the development of maximum utilization of
existing facilities as suggested by space utilization studies conducted by the
State Building Board; and
(h)  securing an adequate and coordinated program for the community colleges
and career and technical education programs in the institutions and
departments in the state system of higher education.
(3) (a)  The board may do all things necessary for the effective
implementation of the statewide master plan as adopted and revised by the
board from time to time.
(b)  The State Board of Education and the Utah College of Applied Technology
shall provide career and technical education staff assistance to the State
Board of Regents in support of master planning activities related to career
and technical education in higher education.
(4) (a)  The board shall adopt rules and initiate programs to promote and
increase productivity in the state system of higher education.
(b)  The board shall require each college and university in the system to
establish multiple measures of institutional and student assessment in order
to improve student instruction, academic programs, and learning opportunities.
(c)  The board shall submit a biennial accountability report to the
Legislature, which shall include such factors as:
(i)  space utilization, faculty productivity, and other similar measures of
the management of institutional resources at each institution; and
(ii)  student assessment at entry to each institution, at critical midway
points, and at exit.
(d)  The board shall establish a systemwide committee to address assessment
and accountability issues and propose essential elements to be included in the
biennial report.
